District of Columbia statutes.
1-321.06

Appropriation for administration of sections mentioned in § 1-321.02.

There is hereby authorized to be appropriated out of the revenues of the District of Columbia such sums as may be necessary to pay the expenses of administering the sections listed in § 1-321.02, including the expenses of the Department of Licenses, Investigation and Inspections, established pursuant to authority contained in Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952.

July 14, 1956, 70 Stat. 535, ch. 590, § 6

History

1981 Ed., § 1-353.
1973 Ed., § 1-259.

Prior Codifications

Functions vested in the Department of Occupations and Professions by Reorganization Order No. 59, dated June 30, 1953, were transferred to the Director of the Department of Economic Development by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. The Department of Economic Development was replaced by Mayor’s Order 78-42, dated February 17, 1978, which Order established the Department of Licenses, Investigation and Inspections. The functions of the Department of Licenses, Investigations, and Inspections were transferred to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs by Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983, effective March 31, 1983.

Transfer of Functions